Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2635
Protective proceedings; request for notice; interested person.

Any interested person who desires to be notified before any order is made in a protective proceeding may file with the registrar a request for notice subsequent to payment of any fee required by statute or court rule. The clerk shall mail a copy of the demand to the conservator if one has been appointed. A request is not effective unless it contains a statement showing the interest of the person making it and his address, or that of his attorney, and is effective only as to matters occurring after the filing. Any governmental agency paying or planning to pay benefits to the person to be protected is an interested person in protective proceedings.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 253, UPC § 5-406.